Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-218 Prohibited advertisement of
association act in insurance sales; notice to policyholders. (a) No
person, including an insurer, and a producer or affiliate of an insurer, shall
make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause
directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or
placed before the public, in any newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or
in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any
radio station or television station, or in any other way, any advertisement,
announcement, or statement, written or oral, which uses the existence of the
Hawaii life and disability insurance guaranty association of this State for the
purpose of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance
covered by the Hawaii Life and Disability Insurance Guaranty Association Act.
This section shall not apply to the Hawaii life and disability insurance
guaranty association or any other entity which does not sell or solicit
insurance.

(b) Within one hundred eighty days of July 1,
1988, the association shall prepare a summary document describing the general
purposes and current limitations of this part and complying with subsection
(c). This document shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval. Sixty
days after receiving such approval, no insurer may deliver a policy or contract
described in section 431:16-203 to a policyholder or contract holder unless the
document is delivered to the policyholder or contract holder at the time of
delivery of the policy or contract except if subsection (d) applies. The
document should also be available upon request by a policyholder. The
distribution, delivery or contents or interpretation of this document shall not
mean that either the policy or the contract or the holder thereof would be
covered in the event of the impairment or insolvency of a member insurer. The
description document shall be revised by the association as amendments to this
part may require. Failure to receive this document does not give the
policyholder, contract holder, certificate holder, or insured any greater
rights than those stated in this part.

(c) The document prepared under subsection (b)
shall contain a clear and conspicuous disclaimer on its face. The commissioner
shall promulgate a rule establishing the form and content of the
disclaimer. The disclaimer shall:

(1) State the name and address of the Hawaii life and
disability insurance guaranty association and the insurance division;

(2) Prominently warn the policy or contract holder
that the Hawaii life and disability insurance guaranty association may not
cover the policy or, if coverage is available, it will be subject to
substantial limitations and exclusions and be conditioned on continued
residence in this State;

(3) State that the insurer and its producers are
prohibited by law from using the existence of the Hawaii life and disability
insurance guaranty association for the purpose of sales, solicitation, or
inducement to purchase any form of insurance;

(4) Emphasize that the policy or contract holder
should not rely on coverage under the Hawaii life and disability insurance
guaranty association when selecting an insurer; and

(5) Provide other information as directed by the commissioner.

(d) No insurer or producer may deliver a
policy or contract described in section 431:16-203(b)(1) and excluded under
section 431:16-203(b)(2)(A) from coverage under this part unless the insurer or
producer, prior to or at the time of delivery, gives the policy or contract
holder a separate written notice which clearly and conspicuously discloses that
the policy or contract is not covered by the Hawaii life and disability
insurance guaranty association. The commissioner shall by rule specify the
form and content of the notice. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 170, §1;
am L 2002, c 155, §95; am L 2003, c 212, §114]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next